Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1504
Deployment project area; determination.

When determining a deployment project area, the granting agency shall collaborate with the Nebraska Broadband Office and the commission to ensure compliance with the Rural Communications Sustainability Act.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 15.